Illinois, session 104th, SB2724.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 424 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/424)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1031)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-55)8    Sec. 424. Unfair methods of competition and unfair or 9deceptive acts or practices defined. The following are hereby 10defined as unfair methods of competition and unfair and 11deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance:12        (1) The commission by any person of any one or more of 13    the acts defined or prohibited by Sections 134, 143.24c, 14    147, 148, 149, 151, 155.22, 155.22a, 155.42, 236, 237, 15    364, 469, and 513b1 of this Code.16        (2) Entering into any agreement to commit, or by any 17    concerted action committing, any act of boycott, coercion 18    or intimidation resulting in or tending to result in 19    unreasonable restraint of, or monopoly in, the business of 20    insurance.21        (3) Making or permitting, in the case of insurance of 22    the types enumerated in Classes 1, 2, and 3 of Section 4, 23    any unfair discrimination between individuals or risks of   SB2724- 2 -LRB104 16011 RPS 29263 b1    the same class or of essentially the same hazard and 2    expense element because of the race, color, religion, or 3    national origin of such insurance risks or applicants. The 4    application of this Article to the types of insurance 5    enumerated in Class 1 of Section 4 shall in no way limit, 6    reduce, or impair the protections and remedies already 7    provided for by Sections 236 and 364 of this Code or any 8    other provision of this Code.9        (4) Engaging in any of the acts or practices defined 10    in or prohibited by Sections 154.5 through 154.8 of this 11    Code.12        (5) Making or charging any rate for insurance against 13    losses arising from the use or ownership of a motor 14    vehicle which requires a higher premium of any person by 15    reason of his physical disability, race, color, religion, 16    or national origin.17        (6) Failing to meet any requirement of the Unclaimed 18    Life Insurance Benefits Act with such frequency as to 19    constitute a general business practice. 20(Source: P.A. 102-778, eff. 7-1-22.) 21    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-55)22    Sec. 424. Unfair methods of competition and unfair or 23deceptive acts or practices defined. The following are hereby 24defined as unfair methods of competition and unfair and 25deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance:  SB2724- 3 -LRB104 16011 RPS 29263 b1        (1) The commission by any person of any one or more of 2    the acts defined or prohibited by Sections 134, 143.24c, 3    147, 148, 149, 151, 155.22, 155.22a, 155.42, 236, 237, 4    364, 469, and 513b1 of this Code.5        (2) Entering into any agreement to commit, or by any 6    concerted action committing, any act of boycott, coercion 7    or intimidation resulting in or tending to result in 8    unreasonable restraint of, or monopoly in, the business of 9    insurance.10        (3) Making or permitting, in the case of insurance of 11    the types enumerated in Classes 1, 2, and 3 of Section 4, 12    any unfair discrimination between individuals or risks of 13    the same class or of essentially the same hazard and 14    expense element because of the race, color, religion, or 15    national origin of such insurance risks or applicants. The 16    application of this Article to the types of insurance 17    enumerated in Class 1 of Section 4 shall in no way limit, 18    reduce, or impair the protections and remedies already 19    provided for by Sections 236 and 364 of this Code or any 20    other provision of this Code.21        (4) Engaging in any of the acts or practices defined 22    in or prohibited by Sections 154.5 through 154.8 of this 23    Code.24        (5) Making or charging any rate for insurance against 25    losses arising from the use or ownership of a motor 26    vehicle which requires a higher premium of any person by   SB2724- 4 -LRB104 16011 RPS 29263 b1    reason of his physical disability, race, color, religion, 2    or national origin.3        (6) Failing to meet any requirement of the Unclaimed 4    Life Insurance Benefits Act with such frequency as to 5    constitute a general business practice. 6        (7) Soliciting either an individual who is a resident 7    of a nursing home or long-term care facility or an 8    individual who is over the age of 65, as described in 9    paragraph (8) of this Section, to purchase accident or 10    health insurance, unless the person who is selling the 11    insurance:12            (A) advises the potential enrollee of the benefit 13        of examining the potential enrollee's current 14        insurance plan, discusses all proposed 15        insurance-related changes with a family member, 16        friend, or other advisor of the potential enrollee, 17        and then waits 48 hours before making any 18        insurance-related changes concerning the potential 19        enrollee;20            (B) provides a phone number that may be called if 21        the potential enrollee or the potential enrollee's 22        family members, friends, or other advisors have any 23        questions; and24            (C) allows the potential enrollee to opt out of 25        any future communications with the person.26        (8) Entering into or amending an accident or health   SB2724- 5 -LRB104 16011 RPS 29263 b1    insurance policy with an individual who is over the age of 2    65 and who has executed a health care power of attorney or 3    has a medical condition, such as dementia, that reduces 4    the person's capacity to make informed decisions 5    independently, unless the potential enrollee's agent under 6    a health care power of attorney executes the agreement and 7    the agreement is reduced to writing.8(Source: P.A. 104-55, eff. 1-1-26.) 9    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 10changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 11that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 12represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 13not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 14made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 15Public Act. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2026.